Alaska, session 34, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.62.310(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) This section does not apply to 06 (1) a governmental body performing a judicial or quasi-judicial 07 function when holding a meeting solely to make a decision in an adjudicatory 08 proceeding; 09 (2) juries; 10 (3) parole or pardon boards; 11 (4) meetings of a hospital medical staff; 12 (5) meetings of the governmental body or any committee of a hospital 13 when holding a meeting solely to act on [UPON] matters of professional 14 qualifications, privileges, or discipline; 01 (6) staff meetings or other gatherings of the employees of a public 02 entity, including meetings of an employee group established by policy of the Board of 03 Regents of the University of Alaska or held while acting in an advisory capacity to the 04 Board of Regents; 05 (7) meetings held for the purpose of participating in or attending a 06 gathering of a national, state, or regional organization of which the public entity, 07 governmental body, or member of the governmental body is a member, but only if no 08 action is taken and no business of the governmental body is conducted at the meetings; 09 or 10 (8) meetings of municipal service area boards established under 11 AS 29.35.450 - 29.35.490 [WHEN MEETING SOLELY TO ACT ON MATTERS 12 THAT ARE ADMINISTRATIVE OR MANAGERIAL IN NATURE]. 13 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.